Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.066

Domestic partner benefits.

A certificate of domestic partnership qualified under the provisions of RCW 26.60.030 shall be recognized as evidence of a state registered domestic partnership fulfilling all necessary eligibility criteria for the partner of the public employee to receive benefits. Nothing in this section affects the requirements of domestic partners to complete documentation related to federal tax status that may currently be required by the board for public employees choosing to make premium payments on a pretax basis.

[ 2023 c 51 s 11; 2018 c 260 s 13; 2015 c 116 s 4; 2007 c 156 s 9.]